District of Columbia statutes.
29-1013.04

Approval for discontinuance or settlement.

A derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association shall not be discontinued or settled without the Superior Court’s approval.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1304 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.